Maryland, session 2026, SB0897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
17–102.
This title applies only in Cecil County.
17–1601.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2)
OF THIS SUBSECTION AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) of this subsection, the Board
may not issue a number of CLASS A licenses that, in the aggregate, exceeds 1 for every
[400] 1,200 2,000 registered voters or major fraction in the county, as determined by the
current registration of voters.
(2) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE NOT FEWER THAN 2 CLASS A LICENSES IN
EACH ELECTION DISTRICT OF THE COUNTY.
– 1 –

Ch. 826 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (3) [A Class BLX beer, wine, and liquor restaurant license, Class C club
license, motel–restaurant complex license, hotel–restaurant complex license, or Class GC
(golf course) beer, wine, and liquor (on–sale) license] NO OTHER CLASS OF LICENSE may
[not] be counted in the computation of the aggregate number of licenses.
(b) The quota shall be computed and applied separately for each election district
of the county.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –